Nebraska, session 109, LB447.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Area of operation means and includes the area within the
corporate limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come
within the purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(2) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created
pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency
created pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited
community redevelopment authority;
(3) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence
of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures,
existence of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in
relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or
unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity
of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair
value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper
subdivision or obsolete platting, or the existence of conditions which
endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of
such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the
community, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or
constitutes an economic or social liability and is detrimental to the
public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and
use and (b) in which there is at least one of the following conditions:
(i) Unemployment in the designated area is at least one hundred twenty
percent of the state or national average; (ii) the average age of the
residential or commercial units in the area is at least forty years;
(iii) more than half of the plotted and subdivided property in an area is
unimproved land that has been within the city for forty years and has
remained unimproved during that time; (iv) the per capita income of the
-2-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
area is lower than the average per capita income of the city or village
in which the area is designated; or (v) the area has had either stable or
decreasing population based on the last two decennial censuses. In no
event shall a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class designate
more than thirty-five percent of the city as blighted, a city of the
second class shall not designate an area larger than fifty percent of the
city as blighted, and a village shall not designate an area larger than
one hundred percent of the village as blighted. A redevelopment project
involving a formerly used defense site as authorized under section
18-2123.01, any area which is located within a good life district
established under the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, and any
area declared to be an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02
shall not count towards the percentage limitations contained in this
subdivision;
(4) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim
certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the
Community Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section
18-2142.04;
(5) Business means any private business located in an enhanced
employment area;
(6) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
(7) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(8) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted
area which the community redevelopment authority designates as
appropriate for a redevelopment project;
(9) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result of a
redevelopment project;
(10) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for by the
employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care
services, including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings
accounts, and employer reimbursement of health care costs;
-3-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
(11) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six
hundred acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is
designated by an authority as eligible for the imposition of an
occupation tax or (b) not within a community redevelopment area as may be
designated under section 18-2142.04;
(12) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by
(a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the product of
forty times the number of weeks in a year;
(13) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted area
in which: (a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the
period covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American
Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least two hundred percent of the
average rate of unemployment in the state during the same period; and (b)
the average poverty rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for the total
federal census tract or tracts or federal census block group or block
groups in the area;
(14) Federal government means the United States of America, or any
agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States
of America;
(15) Governing body or local governing body means the city council,
board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the
municipality;
(16) Limited community redevelopment authority means a community
redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 having
only one single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(17) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the board
of trustees of the village;
(18) New investment means the value of improvements to real estate
made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(19) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent
employees that are employed at a business as a result of the
-4-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
redevelopment project during a year that are in excess of the number of
equivalent employees during the year immediately prior to the year that a
redevelopment plan is adopted;
(20) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to
section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment
project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any
part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any
contract with such authority;
(21) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section 18-2142.02;
(22) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock
association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver,
assignee, or other similar representative thereof;
(23) Public body means the state or any municipality, county,
township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political
subdivision or public body of the state;
(24) Real property means all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used
in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or
equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of
judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such
liens;
(25) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or private
corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a
redevelopment contract;
(26) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into between an
authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in
conformity with a redevelopment plan;
(27) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to time
for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a redevelopment
-5-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
project, which (a) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a
whole and (b) is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition,
demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and
rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the community
redevelopment area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses,
maximum densities, and building requirements;
(28) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one or
more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and
blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or
improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the
proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such substandard and
blighted areas; (b) to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of
existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements
thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities,
parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks
or moving sidewalks, convention and civic centers, bus stop shelters,
lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash receptacles,
shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and
underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area
which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and
prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any
other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites
for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or
otherwise make available land in such areas for residential,
recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or
other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or for
public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with a
redevelopment plan; and may also include the preparation of the
redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a
redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements
for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all real and
-6-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash, or
other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other
facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any
public use specified in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such
disposition shall be at its fair value for uses in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; (e) to acquire real property in a community
redevelopment area which, under the redevelopment plan, is to be repaired
or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or
rehabilitate the structures, and resell the property; (f) to carry out
plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or
demolition of buildings in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and
(g) in a rural community or in an extremely blighted area within a
municipality that is not a rural community, to carry out construction of
workforce housing; and (h) to employ laborers, mechanics, and apprentices
to perform construction work under a redevelopment contract as described
in subsections (6) and (7) of section 18-2119;
(29) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for
assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last
certified for the year prior to the effective date of the provision
authorized in section 18-2147;
(30) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census;
(31) Substandard area means an area in which there is a predominance
of buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or residential in
character, which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or
obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air,
sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding,
or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire
and other causes, or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill
-7-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency,
and crime, (which cannot be remedied through construction of prisons),
and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and
(32) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering
relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that
cost not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct.
For purposes of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated
annually by the Department of Economic Development based upon the most
recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed
value; and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 2. Section 18-2119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2119 (1) An authority shall, by public notice by publication once
each week for two consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper having a general
circulation in the city, prior to the consideration of any redevelopment
contract proposal relating to real estate owned or to be owned by the
authority, invite proposals from, and make available all pertinent
information to, private redevelopers or any persons interested in
undertaking the redevelopment of an area, or any part thereof, which the
governing body has declared to be in need of redevelopment. Such notice
shall identify the area, and shall state that such further information as
is available may be obtained at the office of the authority. The
-8-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
authority shall consider all redevelopment proposals and the financial
and legal ability of the prospective redevelopers to carry out their
proposals and may negotiate with any redevelopers for proposals for the
purchase or lease of any real property in the redevelopment project area.
The authority may accept such redevelopment contract proposal as it deems
to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of the
Community Development Law if the authority has, not less than thirty days
prior thereto, notified the governing body in writing of its intention to
accept such redevelopment contract proposal. Thereafter, the authority
may execute such redevelopment contract in accordance with the provisions
of section 18-2118 and deliver deeds, leases, and other instruments and
take all steps necessary to effectuate such redevelopment contract. In
its discretion, the authority may, without regard to the foregoing
provisions of this section, dispose of real property in a redevelopment
project area to private redevelopers for redevelopment under such
reasonable competitive bidding procedures as it shall prescribe, subject
to the provisions of section 18-2118.
(2) In the case of any real estate owned by a redeveloper, the
authority may enter into a redevelopment contract providing for such
undertakings as the authority shall determine appropriate. Any such
redevelopment contract relating to real estate within an enhanced
employment area shall include a statement of the redeveloper's consent
with respect to the designation of the area as an enhanced employment
area, shall be recorded with respect to the real estate owned by the
redeveloper, and shall be binding upon all future owners of such real
estate.
(3)(a) Prior to entering into a redevelopment contract pursuant to
this section for a redevelopment plan that includes the division of taxes
as provided in section 18-2147, the authority shall require the
redeveloper to certify the following to the authority:
(i) Whether the redeveloper has filed or intends to file an
-9-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
application to receive tax incentives under the Nebraska Advantage Act or
the ImagiNE Nebraska Act for a project located or to be located within
the redevelopment project area;
(ii) Whether such application includes or will include, as one of
the tax incentives, a refund of the city's local option sales tax
revenue; and
(iii) Whether such application has been approved under the Nebraska
Advantage Act or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.
(b) The authority may consider the information provided under
subdivision (3)(a) of this section in determining whether to enter into
the redevelopment contract.
(4) A redevelopment contract for a redevelopment plan or
redevelopment project that includes the division of taxes as provided in
section 18-2147 shall include a provision requiring that the redeveloper
retain copies of all supporting documents that are associated with the
redevelopment plan or redevelopment project and that are received or
generated by the redeveloper for three years following the end of the
last fiscal year in which ad valorem taxes are divided and provide such
copies to the city as needed to comply with the city's retention
requirements under section 18-2117.04. For purposes of this subsection,
supporting document includes any cost-benefit analysis conducted pursuant
to section 18-2113 and any invoice, receipt, claim, or contract received
or generated by the redeveloper that provides support for receipts or
payments associated with the division of taxes.
(5) A redevelopment contract for a redevelopment plan that includes
the division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147 may include a
provision requiring that all ad valorem taxes levied upon real property
in a redevelopment project be paid before the taxes become delinquent in
order for such redevelopment project to receive funds from such division
of taxes.
(6) A redevelopment contract for a redevelopment plan or
-10-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
redevelopment project that includes the division of taxes as provided in
section 18-2147 and that involves real property located within a county
with a population of sixty thousand inhabitants or more shall include a
provision requiring that any laborers and mechanics employed by the
redeveloper or by any contractor or subcontractor to perform the
construction work for the redevelopment project shall be paid wages at
rates not less than the prevailing rates for construction of a similar
character in the locality in which the redevelopment project is located,
as determined by the United States Secretary of Labor in accordance with
Subchapter IV of Chapter 31 of Title 40, United States Code.
(7)(a) A redevelopment contract for a redevelopment plan or
redevelopment project that includes the division of taxes as provided in
section 18-2147 and that involves real property located within a county
with a population of sixty thousand inhabitants or more shall include the
following provisions:
(i) A requirement that not less than fifteen percent of the total
labor hours of the construction work for the redevelopment project,
including such work performed by any contractor or subcontractor, shall
be performed by qualified apprentices, subject to any applicable
requirements for apprenticeship-to-journeyworker ratios of the United
States Department of Labor or the Nebraska Department of Labor; and
(ii) A requirement that each redeveloper, contractor, or
subcontractor that employs four or more individuals to perform
construction work with respect to the redevelopment project shall employ
one or more qualified apprentices to perform such work.
(b) The redevelopment contract shall provide an exception to the
requirements described in subdivision (7)(a) of this section in the event
that qualified apprentices have been requested from a registered
apprenticeship program via certified mail and:
(i) Such request has been denied via certified mail, provided that
such denial is not the result of a refusal by the redeveloper or any
-11-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
contractors or subcontractors engaged in the performance of construction
work with respect to the redevelopment project to comply with the
established standards and requirements of the registered apprenticeship
program; or
(ii) The registered apprenticeship program fails to respond to such
request within fifteen business days after the date on which such
registered apprenticeship program received such request.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Labor hours means the total number of hours devoted to the
performance of construction work by any individual employed by the
redeveloper or by any contractor or subcontractor and excludes any hours
worked by:
(A) Foremen;
(B) Superintendents;
(C) Owners; or
(D) Persons employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or
professional capacity, within the meaning of those terms in 29 C.F.R.
part 541;
(ii) Qualified apprentice means an individual who (A) is represented
by an organization described in section 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 and (B) is employed by a redeveloper or any contractor or
subcontractor participating in a registered apprenticeship program whose
training facility is in this state; and
(iii) Registered apprenticeship program has the same meaning as in
26 U.S.C. 3131(e)(3)(B).
(8) (6) A redevelopment contract for a redevelopment plan or
redevelopment project that includes the division of taxes as provided in
section 18-2147 may include any additional requirements deemed necessary
by the city to ensure that such plan or project complies with the city's
comprehensive development plan, the city's affordable housing action plan
required under section 19-5505, city zoning regulations, and any other
-12-

LB447 LB447
2025 2025
reasonable planning requirements or goals established by the city.
Sec. 3. Original section 18-2119, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-13-